Hawaii statutes.
§325-75 Reporting recovery of patient.
Upon the recovery of any person having tuberculosis, the attending physician
shall make a report of this fact to the department of health or its agent, who
shall record the same, and shall relieve the person from further liability to
any requirement imposed by this part. [L 1911, c 118, §15; RL 1925, §952; RL
1935, §1112; RL 1945, §2330; RL 1955, §49-68; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§325-75]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next